California statutes. Probate Code
A person described in Section 9782 may personally deliver or mail a written objection to the disposition or abandonment to the personal representative on or before the date specified in the notice as the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned. Subject to Section 9788, after receipt of the written objection, the personal representative shall not dispose of or abandon the property without authorization by order of the court obtained under Section 9611.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 78.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9784.

(a) A person described in Section 9782 who objects to the disposition or abandonment of property by the personal representative under Section 9780 may apply to the court in which proceedings for administration of the estate are pending for an order restraining the personal representative from disposing of or abandoning the property without prior court authorization.

(b) The court shall grant the requested order without requiring notice to the personal representative and without cause being shown for the order if the court is satisfied that the estate will not suffer any loss or unreasonable expense if the order is granted. As a condition of granting the order, the court may require the person applying for the order (1) to pay the costs of storing and protecting the property or (2) to provide security by bond or cash deposit that the costs will be paid.

(c) The personal representative is deemed to have notice of the restraining order if it is served upon the personal representative in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or in the manner authorized by the court, before the date specified in the notice as the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9785.

Notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment need not be given to any of the following:

(a) A person who consents in writing to the proposed disposition or abandonment.

(b) A person who, in writing, waives the right to notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9786.

A person who objects to the disposition or abandonment as provided in Section 9783, or who serves a restraining order issued under Section 9784 in the manner provided in that section, shall be given notice of any court hearing on a petition for court authorization of the disposition or abandonment of the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9787.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person described in Section 9782 who receives notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment as provided in Section 9782, waives the right to have the court later review the disposition or abandonment of the property unless the person does one of the following:

(1) Personally delivers or mails a written objection as provided in Section 9783.

(2) Serves a restraining order obtained under Section 9784 before whichever of the following is the later time:

(A) The date specified
 in the notice of proposed disposition or abandonment as the date on or after which the property will be disposed of or abandoned.

(B) The date the property has actually been disposed of or abandoned.

(b) Subject to Section 9785, the court may review the disposition or abandonment of the property upon the motion of a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 9782 who establishes that he or she did not actually receive notice of the proposed disposition or abandonment before the time to object expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 79.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9788.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 9783 and 9784, the personal representative may abandon or dispose of the property without court authorization if the person who made the objection or obtained the restraining order fails to take possession of the property at his or her expense within 10 days after the personal representative requests that the person do so.

(b) A person who takes possession of estate property pursuant to this section is liable for the safekeeping of the property until a court order is made relieving the person of this obligation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Borrowing, Refinancing, and Encumbering Property [9800. - 9807.]

9800.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), after authorization by order of court obtained under this chapter upon a showing that it would be to the advantage of the estate, the personal representative may borrow money on a note, either unsecured or to be secured by a security interest or other lien on the personal property of the estate, or any part thereof, or to be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the real property of the estate, or any part thereof, and may give a security interest or other lien on the personal property of the estate, or any part thereof, or a mortgage or deed of trust on the real property of the estate, or any part thereof, in order to do any one or more of the following:

(1) Pay the debts of the decedent or the estate, devises, expenses of administration, and charges against the estate.

(2) Pay, reduce, extend, or renew a security interest or lien or mortgage or deed of trust already existing on property of the estate.

(3) Improve, use, operate, or preserve property in the estate.

(b) The personal representative shall apply the money to the purpose specified in the order.

(c) Where the surviving spouse has elected to have his or her share of the community real property administered in the decedent’s estate, the personal representative is authorized to borrow money to be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the community real property of the estate, or any part thereof, only with the written consent of the surviving spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9801.

If property of the estate consists of an undivided interest in real or personal property, or any other interest therein less than the entire ownership, upon a showing that it would be to the advantage of the estate to borrow money to improve, use, operate, or preserve the property jointly with the owners of the other interests therein, or to pay, reduce, extend, or renew a security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust already existing on all of the property, the personal representative, after authorization by order of the court obtained under this chapter, may join with the owners of the other interests in borrowing money and the execution of a joint and several note and such security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust as may be required to secure the payment of the note. The note may be for such sum as is required for the purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.

(a) The personal representative or any interested person may file a petition for an order under this chapter.

(b) The petition shall state the purpose for which the order is sought and the necessity for or the advantage to accrue from the order. If applicable, the petition shall also show the amount of money proposed to be borrowed, the rate of interest to be paid, the length of time the note is to run, and a general description of the property proposed to be mortgaged or subjected to the deed of trust, security interest, or other lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9803.

Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9804.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the court is satisfied that it will be to the advantage of the estate, the court shall make an order that authorizes or requires that the personal representative do any one or more of the following:

(1) Borrow money and execute a note.

(2) Execute a mortgage or deed of trust or give other security by security interest or other lien.

(3) Pay, reduce, extend, or renew a security interest or lien or mortgage or deed of trust already existing upon property of the estate.

(b) The court in its order may do any one or more of the following:

(1) Order that the amount specified in the petition, or a lesser amount, be borrowed.

(2) Prescribe the maximum rate of interest and the period of the loan.

(3) Require that the interest and the whole or any part of the principal be paid from time to time out of the whole estate or any part thereof.

(4) Require that the personal property used as security, or any buildings on real property to be mortgaged or subjected to the deed of trust, be insured for the further security of the lender and that the premiums be paid out of the estate.

(5) Specify the purpose for which the money to be borrowed is to be applied. 

(6) Specify the terms and conditions of any extension or renewal agreement.

(7) Prescribe such other terms and conditions concerning the transaction as the court determines to be to the advantage of the estate.

(c) Where the surviving spouse has elected to have his or her share of the community real property administered in the decedent’s estate, an order authorizing or requiring the personal representative to borrow money to be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon the community real property of the estate, or any part thereof, may be made only if the written consent of the surviving spouse has been filed with the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

(a) The personal representative shall execute and deliver the mortgage or deed of trust, or execute and deliver the instrument creating the security interest, setting forth therein that it is made by authority of the order, giving the date of the order.

(b) The note and the mortgage or deed of trust or other instrument creating the security interest, if any, shall be signed by the personal representative and shall be acknowledged by the personal representative if the instrument creates a lien on real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

(a) Every mortgage, deed of trust, or security interest made pursuant to a court order obtained under this chapter is effectual to mortgage, or to subject to the deed of trust or security interest, all of the following:

(1) All right, title, and interest which the decedent had to the property described therein at the time of the decedent’s death.

(2) Any right, title, or interest in the property acquired by the estate of the decedent, by operation of law or otherwise, since the time of the decedent’s death.

(3) Any right, title, or interest in the community real property belonging to the decedent’s surviving spouse whose written consent has been filed with the court and which is referred to in the court order obtained under this chapter.

(b) Jurisdiction of the court to administer the estate of the decedent vests the court with jurisdiction to make the order for the note and for the security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust. This jurisdiction shall conclusively inure to the benefit of the owner of the security interest or lien, mortgagee named in the mortgage, or the trustee and beneficiary named in the deed of trust, and their heirs and assigns.

(c) No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this chapter shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the note, security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust given pursuant to an order under this chapter. Subject to Section 9807, the owner of the security interest or lien, the mortgagee named in the mortgage, or the trustee and beneficiary named in the deed of trust, and their heirs and assigns, have and possess the same rights and remedies on the note and the security interest or lien or mortgage or deed of trust as if it had been made by the decedent prior to his or her death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9807.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no judgment or claim for any deficiency shall be had or allowed against the personal representative or the estate if (1) there is a foreclosure or sale under a security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust and (2) the proceeds of sale of the encumbered property are insufficient to pay the note, the security interest, lien, mortgage, or deed of trust, and the costs or expenses of sale.

(b) If the note, security interest, mortgage, or deed of trust was given to pay, reduce, extend, or renew a lien, security interest, mortgage, or deed of trust existing on property of the estate at the time of death of the decedent and the indebtedness secured thereby was a claim established under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9000), the part of the indebtedness remaining unsatisfied shall be classed with other established claims.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Actions and Proceedings by or Against Personal Representative [9820. - 9823.]

9820.

The personal representative may:

(a) Commence and maintain actions and proceedings for the benefit of the estate.

(b) Defend actions and proceedings against the decedent, the personal representative, or the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9822.

The personal representative may bring an action on the bond of any former personal representative of the same estate, for the use and benefit of all interested persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9823.

(a) If the decedent leaves an undivided interest in any property, an action for partition of the property may be brought against the personal representative.

(b) The personal representative may bring an action against the other cotenants for partition of any property in which the decedent left an undivided interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Compromise of Claims and Actions; Extension, Renewal, or Modification of Obligations [9830. - 9839.]

9830.

(a) Unless this chapter or some other applicable statute requires court authorization or approval, if it is to the advantage of the estate, the personal representative may do any of the following without court authorization, instruction, approval, or confirmation:

(1) Compromise or settle a claim, action, or proceeding by or for the benefit of, or against, the decedent, the personal representative, or the estate, including the giving of a covenant not to sue.

(2) Extend, renew, or in any manner modify the terms of an obligation owing to or in favor of the decedent or the estate.

(3) Release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the estate to the extent that the claim is uncollectible.

(b) Nothing in this section precludes the personal representative from seeking court authorization pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(c) Upon petition of an interested person or upon the court’s own motion, the court may limit the authority of the personal representative under subdivision (a). Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9831.

Unless the time for filing creditor claims has expired, authorization by order of court is required for a compromise or settlement of a claim, action, or proceeding by or for the benefit of, or against, the decedent, the personal representative, or the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9832.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), authorization by order of court is required for a compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification which affects any of the following:

(1) Title to real property.

(2) An interest in real property or a lien or encumbrance on real property.

(3) An option to purchase real property or an interest in real property.

(b) If it is to the advantage of the estate, the personal representative without prior court authorization may extend, renew, or modify a lease of real property in either of the following cases:

(1) Where under the lease as extended, renewed, or modified the rental does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) a month and the term does not exceed one year.

(2) Where the lease is from month to month, regardless of the amount of the rental.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), if the lease as extended, renewed, or modified gives the lessee the right to extend the term of the lease, the length of the term shall be considered as though the right to extend had been exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 24.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

9833.

Authorization by order of court is required for a compromise or settlement of a matter when the transaction requires the transfer or encumbrance of property of the estate, or the creation of an unsecured liability of the estate, or both, in an amount or value in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9834.

Authorization by order of court is required for any of the following:

(a) A compromise or settlement of a claim by the estate against the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney, whether or not the claim arises out of the administration of the estate.

(b) An extension, renewal, or modification of the terms of a debt or similar obligation of the personal representative, or the personal representative’s attorney, owing to, or in favor of, the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9835.

Authorization by order of court is required for the compromise or settlement of a claim or right of action given to the personal representative by any law for the wrongful death or injury of the decedent, including any action brought by the personal representative in attempting enforcement of the claim or right of action. Authorization to compromise or settle the claim or right of action includes authorization to give a covenant not to sue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9836.

The court authorization required by this chapter shall be obtained from the court in which the estate is being administered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9837.

(a) A petition for an order authorizing a compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification under this chapter may be filed by any of the following:

(1) The personal representative.

(2) Any interested person who has obtained the written approval of the personal representative to file the petition.

(b) The petition shall show the terms of the compromise, settlement, extension, renewal, or modification and its advantage to the estate.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9838.

(a) If an order made under Section 9837 authorizes a compromise or settlement that requires the transfer of real property of the estate, the personal representative shall execute a conveyance of the real property to the person entitled thereto under the compromise or settlement. The conveyance shall refer to the order authorizing the compromise or settlement and directing that the conveyance be executed. A certified copy of the order shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any portion of the real property is located.

(b) A conveyance made in compliance with the court order authorizing the compromise or settlement and directing the conveyance to be executed vests in the person to whom the property is transferred both of the following:

(1) All the right, title, and interest which the decedent had in the property at the time of the decedent’s death.

(2) Any other or additional right, title, or interest in the property acquired by the estate of the decedent, by operation of law or otherwise, prior to the transfer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9839.

If the personal representative pays a claim for less than its full amount, the personal representative’s accounts may be credited only for the amount actually paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Acceptance of Deed in Lieu of Foreclosure or Trustee’s Sale; Grant of Partial Satisfaction or Partial Reconveyance [9850. - 9851.]

9850.

(a) If it is to the advantage of the estate to accept a deed to property which is subject to a mortgage or deed of trust in lieu of foreclosure of the mortgage or sale under the deed of trust, the personal representative may, after authorization by order of the court and upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the court, accept a deed conveying the property to the heirs or devisees of the decedent, subject to administration.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition showing the advantage to the estate of accepting the deed. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(c) The court shall make an order under this section only if the advantage to the estate of accepting the deed is shown by clear and convincing evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9851.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if it is to the advantage of the estate for the personal representative to give a partial satisfaction of a mortgage or to cause a partial reconveyance to be executed by a trustee under a trust deed held by the estate, the personal representative may, after authorization by order of the court and upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the court, give the partial satisfaction or cause the partial reconveyance to be executed by the trustee.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition showing the advantage to the estate of giving the partial satisfaction or causing the partial reconveyance. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(c) No authorization by the court is necessary for the personal representative to give a partial satisfaction of a mortgage or to cause a partial reconveyance to be executed by a trustee under a deed of trust held by the estate if the partial satisfaction or partial reconveyance is executed pursuant to the terms of the mortgage or deed of trust held by the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Purchase of Claims or Estate Property by Personal Representative or Personal Representative’s Attorney [9880. - 9885.]

9880.

Except as provided in this chapter, neither the personal representative nor the personal representative’s attorney may do any of the following:

(a) Purchase any property of the estate or any claim against the estate, directly or indirectly.

(b) Be interested in any such purchase.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9881.

Upon a petition filed under Section 9883, the court may make an order under this section authorizing the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney to purchase property of the estate if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) Written consent to the purchase is signed by (1) each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed purchase and (2) each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed purchase.

(b) The written consents are filed with the court.

(c) The purchase is shown to be to the advantage of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.

Upon a petition filed under Section 9883, the court may make an order under this section authorizing the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney to purchase property of the estate if the will of the decedent authorizes the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney to purchase the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9883.

(a) The personal representative may file a petition requesting that the court make an order under Section 9881 or 9882. The petition shall set forth the facts upon which the request for the order is based.

(b) If court confirmation of the sale is required, the court may make its order under Section 9881 or 9882 at the time of the confirmation.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(1) Each person listed in Section 1220.

(2) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed purchase.

(3) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed purchase.

(d) If the court is satisfied that the purchase should be authorized, the court shall make an order authorizing the purchase upon the terms and conditions specified in the order, and the personal representative may execute a conveyance or transfer according to the terms of the order. Unless otherwise provided in the will or in the order of the court, the sale of the property shall be made in the same manner as the sale of other estate property of the same nature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.

This chapter does not prohibit the purchase of property of the estate by the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney pursuant to a contract in writing made during the lifetime of the decedent if the contract is one that can be specifically enforced and the requirements of Part 19 (commencing with Section 850) of Division 2 are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9885.

This chapter does not prevent the exercise by the personal representative or the personal representative’s attorney of an option to purchase property of the estate given in the will of the decedent if the requirements of Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 9980) are satisfied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Dedication or Conveyance to Governmental Entity; Easements and Access Rights [9900. - 9901.]

9900.

If it is to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons, the personal representative, after authorization by order of the court obtained under this chapter and upon such terms and conditions as the court may prescribe, may do any of the following either with or without consideration:

(a) Dedicate or convey real property of the estate for any purpose to any of the following:

(1) This state or any public entity in this state.

(2) The United States or any agency or instrumentality of the United States. 

(b) Dedicate or convey an easement over real property of the estate to any person for any purpose.

(c) Convey, release, or relinquish to this state or any public entity in this state any access rights to any street, highway, or freeway from any real property of the estate.

(d) Consent as a lienholder to a dedication, conveyance, release, or relinquishment under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) by the owner of property subject to the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9901.

(a) The personal representative or any interested person may file a petition for an order under this chapter.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Exchange of Property [9920. - 9923.]

9920.

If it is to the advantage of the estate to exchange property of the estate for other property, the personal representative may, after authorization by order of court obtained under this chapter and upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the court, exchange the property for the other property. The terms and conditions prescribed by the court may include the payment or receipt of part cash by the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9921.

To obtain an order under this chapter, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition containing all of the following:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) The terms and conditions of the proposed exchange.

(c) A showing that the proposed exchange is to the advantage of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9922.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(b) If the petition is for authorization to exchange securities as defined in Section 10200 for different securities, the court, upon a showing of good cause, may order that the notice be given for a shorter period or that the notice be dispensed with. The order provided by this subdivision may be made ex parte.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9923.

No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this chapter shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the exchange made pursuant to an order made under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Leases [9940. - 9948.]

9940.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(a) “Lease” includes, without limitation, a lease that includes an option to purchase real propery of the estate.

(b) If a lease gives the lessee the right to extend the term of the lease, the length of the term shall be considered as though the right to extend had been exercised.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9941.

If it is to the advantage of the estate, the personal representative may lease, as lessor, real property of the estate without authorization of the court in either of the following cases:

(a) Where the rental does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) a month and the term does not exceed one year.

(b) Where the lease is from month to month, regardless of the amount of the rental.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 25.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

9942.

(a) The personal representative may lease, as lessor, real property of the estate after authorization by order of court obtained under this chapter upon a showing that the proposed lease is to the advantage of the estate.

(b) If the proposed lease includes an option to purchase real property of the estate, a petition for an order authorizing the lease shall be filed under this chapter but the applicable provisions for court approval both in this chapter and in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 9960) apply to the execution of the lease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9943.

(a) To obtain an order under this chapter, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition containing all of the following: 

(1) A general description of the real property proposed to be leased.

(2) The term, rental, and general conditions of the proposed lease.

(3) A showing that the proposed lease is to the advantage of the estate.

(b) If the lease is proposed to be for a term longer than 10 years, the petition shall also state facts showing the need for the longer lease and its advantage to the estate and its benefit to the interested persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9944.

(a) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 and posted as provided in Section 1230.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition also shall be given as provided in Section 10300, but this notice is not required if the will authorizes or directs the personal representative to lease or sell property.

(c) If the lease is proposed to be for a term longer than 10 years, in addition to the notice required by subdivision (a), notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(1) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed lease.

(2) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the proposed lease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9945.

(a) At the hearing, the court shall entertain and consider any other offer made in good faith at the hearing to lease the same property on more favorable terms.

(b) If the court is satisfied that it will be to the advantage of the estate, and, if the lease is for more than 10 years, that it is to the benefit of interested persons, the court shall make an order authorizing the personal representative to make the lease to the person on the terms and conditions stated in the order. The court shall not make an order authorizing the personal representative to make the lease to any person other than the lessee named in the petition unless the offer made at the hearing is acceptable to the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9946.

(a) Subject to Section 9947, an order authorizing the execution of a lease shall set forth the minimum rental or royalty or both and the period of the lease.

(b) The order may authorize other terms and conditions of the lease, including, with respect to a lease for the purpose of exploration for or production or removal of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances, or geothermal energy, any one or more of the following provisions:

(1) A provision for the payment of rental and royalty to a depositary.

(2) A provision for the appointment of a common agent to represent the interests of all the lessors.

(3) A provision for the payment of a compensatory royalty in lieu of rental and in lieu of drilling and producing operations on the land covered by the lease. 

(4) A provision empowering the lessee to enter into any agreement authorized by Section 3301 of the Public Resources Code with respect to the land covered by the lease.

(5) A provision for a community oil lease or a pooling or unitization by the lessee.

(c) If the lease covers additional property owned by other persons or an undivided or other interest of the decedent less than the entire ownership in the property, the order may authorize the lease to provide for division of rental and royalty in the proportion that the land or interest of each owner bears to the total area of the land or total interests covered by the lease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9947.

(a) Except as provided in this section, the term of the lease shall be for such period as the court may authorize.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the court shall not authorize a lease for longer than 10 years if any heir or devisee who has an interest in the property to be leased objects at the hearing.

(c) If the lease is for the purpose of exploration for or production or removal of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances, or geothermal energy, the court may authorize that the lease be for a fixed period and any of the following:

(1) So long thereafter as minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances or geothermal energy are produced in paying quantities from the property leased or mining or drilling operations are conducted thereon.

(2) If the lease provides for the payment of a compensatory royalty, so long thereafter as such compensatory royalty is paid.

(3) If the land covered by the lease is included in an agreement authorized by Section 3301 of the Public Resources Code, so long thereafter as oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances are produced in paying quantities from any of the lands included in any such agreement or drilling operations are conducted thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9948.

(a) The personal representative shall execute, acknowledge, and deliver the lease as directed, setting forth therein that it is made by authority of the order, giving the date of the order.

(b) A lease made pursuant to an order obtained under this chapter is effectual to lease the premises described in the order at the rent, for the term, and upon the terms and conditions prescribed in the order.

(c) Jurisdiction of the court in proceedings under this code concerning the administration of the estate of the decedent vests the court with jurisdiction to make the order for the lease. This jurisdiction shall conclusively inure to the benefit of the lessee and the lessee’s heirs and assigns.

(d) No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this chapter shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the lease made pursuant to an order made under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Granting Option to Purchase Real Property [9960. - 9966.]

9960.

After authorization by order of court obtained under this chapter, the personal representative may grant an option to purchase real property of the estate for a period within or beyond the period of administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9961.

To obtain an order under this chapter, the personal representative shall file a petition containing all of the following:

(a) A description of the real property.

(b) The terms and conditions of the proposed option.

(c) A showing that granting the option is to the advantage of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9962.

The purchase price of the real property subject to the option shall be at least 90 percent of the appraised value of the real property. The appraisal shall be made in the manner provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10309 within one year prior to the hearing of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9963.

Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be posted as provided in Section 1230 and given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(a) Each person listed in Section 1220.

(b) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the granting of the option.

(c) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the granting of the option.
